Ohio, session 136, HB602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 123.30 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 123.30. (A) As used in this section, "authorized flag" means any of the following: (1) The official state flag as described in section 5.01 of the Revised Code; (2) The United States flag; (3) The POW/MIA flag as described in section 9.50 of the Revised Code; (4) A flag containing the official logo of a state agency, so long as the flag has been approved by the governor or the governor's designee. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, no state agency or any entity that manages the grounds or buildings under the control of a state agency shall display on the grounds or building any flag except for an authorized flag. (C) Division (B) of this section does not apply to the Ohio statehouse or the grounds of the Ohio statehouse. Section 2. That existing section 123.30 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.